Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5127
Canadian provincial and municipal obligations.

An insurer may invest in direct obligations of any province or municipality of Canada or obligations for which the full faith and credit of any province or municipality of Canada is pledged for the payment of all principal and interest. Any investment authorized under this section shall have a minimum quality rating as described in subdivision (2) of section 44-5112.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 27;

Laws 1997, LB 273, § 12.